Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8901
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-8901 to 71-8929 shall be known and may be cited as the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB252, § 1.